Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 2. Notification and Fees

§ 40-14-630.
Applicability.

This part applies to a person engaged in this state in making consumer credit sales, consumer leases or consumer loans, including a pawnbroker, sales finance company and post-dated check casher, and to a person having an office or place of business who takes assignments of and undertakes direct collection of payments from or enforcement of rights against debtors arising from these sales, leases or loans.

Supervised financial organizations as defined by W.S. 40-14-140(a)(xix) shall be exempt from this part.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 6-201; W.S. 1957, § 40-6-201; Laws 1975, ch. 167, § 1; 1981, ch. 147, § 1; 1996, ch. 86, § 2; 2021 ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added the (a) designation; and added (b).

§ 40-14-631.
Notification.

Persons subject to this part shall file notification with the administrator within thirty (30) days after commencing business in this state, and, thereafter, on or before January 31 of each year. The notification shall state:

Name of the person;

Name in which business is transacted if different from paragraph (a)(i) of this section;

Address of principal office, which may be outside this state;

Address of all offices or retail stores, if any, in this state at which consumer credit sales, consumer leases, or consumer loans are made, or in the case of a person taking assignments of obligations, the offices or places of business within this state at which business is transacted;

If consumer credit sales, consumer leases, or consumer loans are made otherwise than at an office or retail store in this state, a brief description of the manner in which they are made;

Address of designated agent upon whom service of process may be made in this state; and

Whether supervised loans are made.

If information in a notification becomes inaccurate after filing, such change shall be promptly given the administrator.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 6-202; W.S. 1957, § 40-6-202.

Cross references. —

As to willful violation of section, see §

40-14-540

.

§ 40-14-632.
Fees.

A person required to file notification shall on or before January 31 of each year pay to the administrator an annual fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for that year.

Persons required to file notification who are sellers, lessors or lenders shall pay an additional fee at the time and in the manner stated in subsection (a) of this section of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00), or part thereof, in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00), of the original unpaid balances arising from consumer credit sales, consumer leases and consumer loans made in this state within the preceding calendar year and held either by the seller, lessor or lender for more than thirty (30) days after the inception of the sale, lease or loan giving rise to the obligations, or by an assignee who has not filed notification. A refinancing of a sale, lease or loan resulting in an increase in the amount of an obligation is considered a new sale, lease or loan to the extent of the amount of the increase. The administrator may by rule increase this fee to an amount not greater than thirty-five dollars ($35.00) per one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00), or part thereof, in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) of the original unpaid balances if he determines that an increase is necessary to cover the cost of administration of this act.

Persons required to file notification who are assignees shall pay an additional fee at the time and in the manner stated in subsection (a) of this section of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00), or part thereof, of the unpaid balances at the time of the assignment of obligations arising from consumer credit sales, consumer leases and consumer loans made in this state taken by assignment during the preceding calendar year, but an assignee need not pay a fee with respect to an obligation on which the assignor or other person has already paid a fee. The administrator may by rule increase this fee to an amount not greater than thirty-five dollars ($35.00) per one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00), or part thereof, in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) if he determines that an increase is necessary to cover the cost of administration of this act.

Fees charged, paid and collected under this section shall be subject to the requirements of W.S. 13-1-603(d) through (f).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 6-203; W.S. 1957, § 40-6-203; Laws 1973, ch. 186, § 1; ch. 245, § 3; 1975, ch. 167, § 2; 1981, ch. 147, § 1; 1988, ch. 49, § 1; 2001, ch. 156, § 2; 2021 ch. 40, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added (d).

Cross references. —

As to willful violation of section, see §

40-14-540

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).

§ 40-14-633.
Crediting of monies.

All fees and other monies received by the administrator under the provisions of this act shall be deposited by the administrator with the state treasurer and credited to the consumer credit administration account, except the amount paid for data processing by the registry or any other entity designated by the registry. The funds deposited in the account under this act shall be subject to appropriation by the legislature to the administrator and shall be expended only to carry out the duties of the administrator. Expenditures shall be made from the account by warrants drawn by the state auditor, upon vouchers issued and signed by the administrator.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 6-204; W.S. 1957, § 40-6-204; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1994, ch. 14, § 1; 1996, ch. 86, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2009, ch. 184, § 2; 2013 ch. 27, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added “except the amount paid for data processing by a national mortgage licensing system and database” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “the registry or any other entity designated by the registry” for “a national mortgage licensing system and database” in the first sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”